Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5902.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 Sec. 25. Fees for a person an individual licensed or seeking licensure as a cosmetologist, manicurist, natural hair culturist, esthetician, electrologist, hairdresser, or instructor or a person licensed or seeking licensure to operate a cosmetology establishment or school of cosmetology, seeking a student 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 registration or transfer, or seeking a permit to conduct an apprenticeship program under article 12 of the occupational code, MCL 339.1201 to 339.1218, are as follows: (a) Application processing fees: (i) Apprenticeship program $ 25.00 (ii) Cosmetologist, manicurist, natural hair culturist, esthetician, electrologist, hairdresser, or instructor as follows: (A) If paid after September 30, 2027 10.00 (B) Beginning October 1, 2003 through September 30, 2027 15.00 (iii) Cosmetology establishment 25.00 (iv) School of cosmetology 100.00 (b) Examination fees: (i) Complete examination for cosmetologist, manicurist, natural hair culturist, esthetician, electrologist, hairdresser, or instructor 25.00 (ii) Written portion only 15.00 (iii) Practical portion only 15.00 (iv) Examination review 20.00 (c) License fees, per year: (i) Cosmetologist, manicurist, natural hair culturist, esthetician, electrologist, hairdresser, or instructor as follows: (A) If paid after September 30, 2027 12.00 (B) Beginning October 1, 2003 through September 30, 2027 24.00 (ii) Cosmetology establishment 25.00 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 (iii) School of cosmetology 100.00 (d) Student registration or transfer fee as follows: (i) If paid after September 30, 2027 5.00 (ii) Beginning October 1, 2003 through September 30, 2027 15.00 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5206 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.